Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.045

Pupil tests and records—Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules relating to pupil tests and records.

[ 2006 c 263 s 704.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.